Hawaii, session 2026, HB2190.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 264, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part I to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§264- Infrastructure cost and timeline; transparency.  The department of transportation shall create and maintain an electronic dashboard on its website disclosing the costs, status, and expected timeline for completion of each current state construction project in excess of $1,000,000 involving state roads or highways." SECTION 2.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________